Nebraska, session 109, LB121.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB121 LB121
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 13-2039, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
13-2039 (1)(a) A landfill may accept yard waste without condition
from December 1 through March 31 of each year.
(b) A landfill may accept yard waste year-round if such yard waste:
(i) Will be used for the production and recovery of methane gas for
use as fuel (A) with the approval of the department and (B) at a landfill
operating as a solid waste management facility with a permit issued
pursuant to the department's rules and regulations; or
(ii) Has been separated at its source from other solid waste and
will be used for the purpose of soil conditioning or composting.
(c) State and local governmental entities responsible for the
maintenance of public lands shall give preference to the use of composted
materials in all land maintenance activities. This section does not
prohibit the use of yard waste as land cover or as soil-conditioning
material.
(2) Land disposal of lead-acid batteries and waste oil is
prohibited.
(3)(a) Land disposal of waste tires in any form is prohibited except
tires that are nonrecyclable. For purposes of this subsection,
nonrecyclable tire means a press-on solid tire, a solid pneumatic shaped
tire, or a foam pneumatic tire.
(b) On and after September 1, 2003, placing or causing the placement
or disposal of scrap tires in any form into the waters of the state is
prohibited except as provided in section 13-2033.
(c) Tires are not considered disposed if they are (i) processed into
crumb rubber form and reused or recycled in manufactured products such
as, but not limited to, products used for schools, playgrounds, and
residential, lawn, and garden applications, (ii) used as safety barriers
for race courses for motorized vehicles, on the condition that the tires
are bolted together and properly wrapped, and not in loose, compressed,
-2-

LB121 LB121
2025 2025
or baled form, (iii) used as tire-derived fuel, (iv) retreaded, (v)
processed into chip or shred form and used as drainage media in landfill
construction or septic drain fields, (vi) used as a raw material in
steelmaking, or (vii) processed into shred form and used as an
alternative daily cover in a landfill or for a civil engineering project
if such project is designed and constructed in compliance with the
Engineers and Architects Regulation Act and prior approval for such
project is obtained from the department by the tire shredder and the end
user, except that departmental approval is not necessary for a tire
project involving three thousand five hundred or fewer passenger tire
equivalents of waste tires if the department receives notification of the
project not later than thirty days prior to any construction on such
project. The notification shall contain the name and address of the tire
shredder and end user, the location of the project, a description of the
type of project, the number of passenger tire equivalents of waste tires
to be used, and any additional information the council determines is
necessary to accomplish the purposes of the Integrated Solid Waste
Management Act.
A race sponsor using tires as safety barriers pursuant to
subdivision (3)(c)(ii) of this section prior to October 1, 2006, shall
file an approved tire disposal plan with the department on or before
January 1, 2007. A race sponsor using tires as safety barriers on or
after October 1, 2006, shall file an approved tire disposal plan with the
department prior to the sponsor's first such use of tires. An approved
tire disposal plan shall provide for the disposal of tires which cease to
be used as safety barriers in accordance with subsection (3) of section
13-2033, and any such race sponsor who ceases to use tires as safety
barriers or whose facility ceases operation shall dispose of such tires
in accordance with his or her approved tire disposal plan. Any
modification to an approved tire disposal plan shall be submitted to and
approved by the department prior to implementation of such modified plan.
-3-

LB121 LB121
2025 2025
An approved tire disposal plan shall continue in effect as long as such
sponsor uses tires as safety barriers.
(4) Land disposal of discarded household appliances is prohibited.
(5) Land disposal of unregulated hazardous wastes, except household
hazardous wastes, which are exempt from the regulations under the
Environmental Protection Act is prohibited unless such disposal occurs at
a licensed hazardous waste disposal facility.
(6) Land disposal of solar panels and wind turbine blades and the
component parts of solar panels and wind turbine blades is prohibited.
(7) (6) For purposes of this section, land disposal shall include,
but not be limited to, incineration at a landfill.
Sec. 2. Original section 13-2039, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-4-